District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-901

Definitions.

Repealed.

History

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 480, ch. 397, § 1
Mar. 14, 1984, D.C. Law 5-57, § 2(a), 30 DCR 6290
June 29, 1984, D.C. Law 5-92, § 2(a), 31 DCR 2542
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-901.
1981 Ed., § 29-1101.
1973 Ed., § 29-801.